District of Columbia statutes.
23-1332

Applicability of subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply in the District of Columbia in lieu of the provisions of sections 3146 through 3152 of Title 18, United States Code.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 650, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1332.
1973 Ed., § 23-1332.